Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 35 Military Justice
35.491.
Failure to obey order or regulation.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Violates or fails to obey any lawful general order or regulation;

Having knowledge of any other lawful order issued by a member of the state military forces, which it is the person’s duty to obey, fails to obey the order; or

Is derelict in the performance of the person’s duties.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 70; 2013, ch. 32, § 96, effective June 25, 2013.

35.495.
Punishment for enumerated crimes. [Repealed.]

35.500.
Acts constituting murder. [Repealed.]

35.505.
Acts constituting manslaughter. [Repealed.]

35.510.
Acts constituting rape or carnal knowledge. [Repealed.]

35.515.
Acts constituting arson or wrongful appropriation. [Repealed.]

35.520.
Acts constituting robbery. [Repealed.]

35.525.
Acts constituting forgery. [Repealed.]

35.530.
Acts constituting maiming. [Repealed.]

35.535.
Acts constituting sodomy. [Repealed.]

35.540.
Acts constituting aggravated arson or simple arson. [Repealed.]

35.545.
Acts constituting extortion. [Repealed.]

35.550.
Acts constituting assault or aggravated assault. [Repealed.]

35.555.
Acts constituting burglary. [Repealed.]

35.560.
Acts constituting housebreaking. [Repealed.]

35.565.
Persons charged with certain crimes against the United States or the Commonwealth to be turned over to civil authorities. [Repealed.]

35.570.
Delivery of persons charged with felony to civil authorities. [Repealed.]

35.575.
Cruelty and maltreatment.

Any person subject to this code who is guilty of cruelty toward, or oppression or maltreatment of, any person subject to the person’s orders shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 71; 2013, ch. 32, § 97, effective June 25, 2013.

35.577.
Mutiny or sedition.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

With intent to usurp or override lawful military authority, refuses, in concert with any other person, to obey orders or otherwise do his or her duty or creates any violence or disturbance is guilty of mutiny;

With intent to cause the overthrow or destruction of lawful civil authority, creates, in concert with any other person, revolt, violence, or other disturbance against that authority is guilty of sedition; or

Fails to do his or her utmost to prevent and suppress a mutiny or sedition being committed in his or her presence, or fails to take all reasonable means to inform his or her superior commissioned officer or commanding officer of an offense of mutiny or sedition which he or she knows or has reason to believe is taking place, is guilty of a failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition.

A person who is found guilty of attempted mutiny, mutiny, sedition, or failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 98, effective June 25, 2013.

35.580.
Resistance, flight, breach of arrest, and escape.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Resists apprehension;

Flees from apprehension;

Breaks arrest; or

Escapes from custody or confinement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 72; 2013, ch. 32, § 99, effective June 25, 2013.

35.585.
Releasing prisoner without proper authority.

Any person subject to this code who, without proper authority, releases any prisoner committed to his or her charge, or who through neglect or design suffers any such prisoner to escape, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, whether or not the prisoner was committed in strict compliance with law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 73; 2013, ch. 32, § 100, effective June 25, 2013.

35.590.
Unlawful detention.

Any person subject to this code who, except as provided by law or regulation, apprehends, arrests, or confines any person shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 74; 2013, ch. 32, § 101, effective June 25, 2013.

35.595.
Noncompliance with procedural rules.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Is responsible for unnecessary delay in the disposition of any case of a person accused of an offense under this code; or

Knowingly and intentionally fails to enforce or comply with any provision of this code regulating the proceedings before, during, or after trial of an accused.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 75; 2013, ch. 32, § 102, effective June 25, 2013.

35.600.
Misbehavior before the enemy.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who, before or in the presence of the enemy or any hostile force:

Runs away;

Shamefully abandons, surrenders, or delivers up any command, unit, place, or military property which it is his or her duty to defend;

Through disobedience, neglect, or intentional misconduct endangers the safety of any such command, unit, place, or military property;

Casts away his or her arms or ammunition;

Is guilty of cowardly conduct;

Quits his or her place of duty to plunder or pillage;

Causes false alarms in any command, unit, or place under control of the Armed Forces of the United States or the state military forces;

Willfully fails to do his or her utmost to encounter, engage, capture , or destroy any enemy troops, combatants, vessels, aircraft, or any other thing, which it is his or her duty so to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy; or

Does not afford all practicable relief and assistance to any troops, combatants, vessels, or aircraft of the Armed Forces belonging to the United States or their allies, to the state, or to any other state, when engaged in battle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 76; 2013, ch. 32, § 103, effective June 25, 2013.

35.605.
Subordinate compelling surrender.

Any person subject to this code who compels or attempts to compel the commander of the state military forces of the state, or of any other state, place, vessel, aircraft, or other military property, or of any body of members of the Armed Forces, to give it up to an enemy or to abandon it, or who strikes the colors or flag to an enemy without proper authority, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 77; 2013, ch. 32, § 104, effective June 25, 2013.

35.609.
Improper use of countersign.

Any person subject to this code who in time of war discloses the parole or countersign to any person not entitled to receive it or who gives to another, who is entitled to receive and use the parole or countersign, a different parole or countersign from that which, to his knowledge, he was authorized and required to give, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 105, effective June 25, 2013.

35.610.
Improper use of countersign. [Repealed.]

35.614.
Forcing a safeguard.

Any person subject to this code who forces a safeguard shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 106, effective June 25, 2013.

35.615.
Forcing safeguard. [Repealed.]

35.620.
Captured or abandoned property.

All persons subject to this code shall secure all property taken for the service of the United States or the state, and shall give notice and turn over to the proper authority without delay all captured or abandoned property in their possession, custody, or control.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Fails to carry out the duties prescribed in subsection (1) of this section; or

Buys, sells, trades, or in any way deals in or disposes of taken, captured or abandoned property whereby he or she receives or expects any profit, benefit, or advantage to himself or herself or another person directly or indirectly connected; or

Engages in looting or pillaging.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 80; 2013, ch. 32, § 107, effective June 25, 2013.

35.625.
Aiding the enemy.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Aids, or attempts to aid, the enemy with arms, ammunition, supplies, money, or other things; or

Without proper authority, knowingly harbors or protects or gives intelligence to, or communicates or corresponds with or holds any intercourse with the enemy, either directly or indirectly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 81; 2013, ch. 32, § 108, effective June 25, 2013.

35.630.
Misconduct as prisoner.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who, while in the hands of the enemy in time of war:

For the purpose of securing favorable treatment by his or her captors, acts without proper authority in a manner contrary to law, custom, or regulation, to the detriment of others of whatever nationality held by the enemy as civilian or military prisoners; or

While in a position of authority over such persons maltreats them without justifiable cause.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 82; 2013, ch. 32, § 109, effective June 25, 2013.

35.635.
False official statements.

Any person subject to this code who, with intent to deceive, signs any false record, return, regulation, order, or other official document made in the line of duty, knowing it to be false, or makes any other false official statement made in the line of duty, knowing it to be false, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 83; 2013, ch. 32, § 110, effective June 25, 2013.

35.637.
Military property — Loss, damage, destruction, or wrongful disposition.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct, if that person, without proper authority:

Sells or otherwise disposes of;

Willfully or through neglect damages, destroy, or loses; or

Willfully or through neglect suffers to be lost, damaged, destroyed, sold, or wrongfully disposed of;

any military property of the United States or of any state.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 111, effective June 25, 2013.

35.640.
Property other than military property — Waste, spoilage, or destruction.

Any person subject to this code who willfully or recklessly wastes, spoils, or otherwise willfully and wrongfully destroys or damages any property other than military property of the United States or of any state shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 84; 2013, ch. 32, § 112, effective June 25, 2013.

35.642.
Improper hazarding of vessel.

Any person subject to this code who willfully and wrongfully hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the Armed Forces of the United States or any state military forces shall suffer such punishment as a court-martial may direct.

Any person subject to this code who negligently hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the Armed Forces of the United States or any state military forces shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 113, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2013). 2013 Ky. Acts ch. 32, sec. 113, prescribed that this statute be created as a new section of KRS Chapter 110. Since there currently is not a KRS Chapter 110 to be utilized, the Reviser of Statutes has created this statute as a new section of KRS Chapter 35 to correct this manifest clerical or typographical error under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

35.645.
Driving under the influence or reckless driving.

Any person subject to this code who operates or is in physical control of any vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or any other substances or combination of substances which impair one’s driving ability, or in a reckless or wanton manner, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 85; 2013, ch. 32, § 114, effective June 25, 2013.

35.650.
Drunk on duty.

Any person subject to this code other than a sentinel or lookout, who is found drunk on duty, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 86; 2013, ch. 32, § 115, effective June 25, 2013.

35.652.
Wrongful use, possession, etc., of controlled substances.

Any person subject to this code who wrongfully uses, possesses, manufactures, distributes, or imports into the customs territory of the United States, exports from the United States, or introduces into an installation, vessel, vehicle, or aircraft used by or under the control of the Armed Forces of the United States, state military forces, or the state military forces of any other state a substance described in subsection (2) of this section shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

The substances referred to in subsection (1) of this section are the following:

Opium, heroin, cocaine, amphetamine, lysergic acid diethylamide, methamphetamine, phencyclidine, barbituric acid, and marijuana and any compound or derivative of any of these substances;

Any substance not specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection that is listed on a schedule of controlled substances prescribed by the President for the purposes of the Uniform Code of Military Justice of the Armed Forces of the United States, 10

U.S.C. secs. 801

et seq.; and

Any other substance not specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection or contained on a list prescribed by the President under paragraph (b) of this subsection that is listed in schedules I through V of Article 202 of the Controlled Substances Act, 21

U.S.C. sec. 812

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 116, effective June 25, 2013.

35.654.
Misbehavior of sentinel.

Any sentinel or lookout who is found drunk or sleeping upon his or her post or leaves it before being regularly relieved, shall be punished, if the offense is committed in a time of war, by confinement of not more than ten (10) years or other punishment as a court-martial may direct, but if the offense is committed at any other time, by such punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 117, effective June 25, 2013.

35.655.
Dueling. [Repealed.]

35.657.
Dueling.

Any person subject to this code who fights or promotes, or is concerned in or connives at fighting a duel, or who, having knowledge of a challenge sent or about to be sent, fails to report the fact promptly to the proper authority, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 118, effective June 25, 2013.

35.660.
Malingering.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who, for the purpose of avoiding work, duty or service:

Feigns illness, physical disablement, mental lapse, or derangement; or

Intentionally inflicts self-injury.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 88; 2013, ch. 32, § 119, effective June 25, 2013.

35.665.
Riot or breach of peace.

Any person subject to this code who causes or participates in any riot or breach of the peace shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 56, § 89; 2013, ch. 32, § 120, effective June 25, 2013.

35.670.
Larceny — Wrongful appropriation. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.671.
Provoking speeches or gestures.

Any person subject to this code who uses provoking or reproachful words or gestures towards another person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 121, effective June 25, 2013.

35.675.
Unbecoming conduct. [Repealed.]

35.678.
Definitions for KRS 35.678 to 35.690.

As used in KRS

35.678

to

35.690

:

“Act of prostitution” means a sexual act or sexual contact as defined in subsection (12) or (13) of this section, respectively, on account of which anything of value is given to, or received by, any person;

“Bodily harm” means any offensive touching of another, however slight, including any nonconsensual sexual act or nonconsensual sexual contact;

“Broadcast” means delivering to the actual or constructive possession of another, including transmission by electronic means;

“Consent” means a freely given agreement to the conduct at issue by a competent person. An expression of lack of consent through words or conduct means there is no consent. Lack of verbal or physical resistance or submission resulting from the use of force, threat of force, or placing another person in fear does not constitute consent. A current or previous dating or social or sexual relationship by itself or the manner of dress of the person involved with the accused in the conduct at issue shall not constitute consent.

A sleeping, unconscious, or incompetent person cannot consent. A person cannot consent to force causing or likely causing death or grievous bodily harm or to being rendered unconscious. A person cannot consent while under threat or fear or under the circumstances described in KRS 35.681(2)(a)3. and 4.

Lack of consent may be inferred based on the circumstances of the offense. All the surrounding circumstances are to be considered in determining whether a person gave consent, or whether a person did not resist or ceased to resist only because of another person’s actions;

“Course of conduct” means:

A repeated maintenance of visual or physical proximity to a specific person; or

A repeated conveyance of verbal threat, written threats, or threats implied by conduct, or a combination of these threats, directed at or towards a specific person;

“Force” means:

The use of a weapon;

The use of such physical strength or violence as is sufficient to overcome, restrain, or injure a person; or

Inflicting physical harm sufficient to coerce or compel submission by the victim;

“Grievous bodily harm” means serious bodily injury. It includes fractures or dislocated bones, deep cuts, torn members of the body, serious damage to internal organs, and other severe bodily injuries. It does not include minor injuries such as a black eye or a bloody nose;

“Immediate family,” in the case of a specific person, means a spouse, parent, child, or sibling of the person, or any other family member, relative, or intimate partner of the person who regularly resides in the household of the person or who within the six (6) months preceding the commencement of the course of conduct regularly resided in the household of the person;

“Indecent manner” means conduct that amounts to a form of immorality relating to sexual impurity which is grossly vulgar, obscene, and repugnant to common propriety, and tends to excite sexual desire or deprave morals with respect to sexual relations;

“Private area” means the naked or underwear-clad genitalia, anus, buttocks, or female areola or nipple;

“Repeated,” with respect to conduct, means two (2) or more occasions of that conduct;

“Sexual act” means:

Contact between the penis and the vulva or anus or mouth, and, for purposes of this paragraph, contact involving the penis occurs upon penetration, however slight; or

The penetration, however slight, of the vulva or anus or mouth of another by any part of the body or by any object, with an intent to abuse, humiliate, harass, or degrade any person or to arouse or gratify the sexual desire of any person;

“Sexual contact” means:

Touching, or causing another person to touch, either directly or through the clothing, the genitalia, anus, groin, breast, inner thigh, or buttocks of any person, with an intent to abuse, humiliate, or degrade any person; or

Any touching, or causing another person to touch, either directly or through the clothing, any body parts of another person, if done with an intent to arouse or gratify the sexual desire of any person. Touching may be accomplished by any part of the body;

“Threatening or placing that other person in fear” means a communication or action that is of sufficient consequences to cause a reasonable fear that noncompliance will result in the victim or another person being subjected to the wrongful action contemplated by the communication or action;

“Under circumstances in which that other person has a reasonable expectation of privacy” means:

Circumstances in which a reasonable person would believe that he or she could disrobe in privacy, without being concerned that an image of a private area of that person was being captured; or

Circumstances in which a reasonable person would believe that a private area of that person would not be visible to the public; and

“Unlawful force” means an act of force done without legal justification or excuse.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 75, § 5, effective July 15, 2016.

35.679.
Sexual harassment.

Any person subject to this code is guilty of sexual harassment and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Influences, offers to influence, or threatens the career, reputation, pay, or job of another person in exchange for sexual favors;

Makes deliberate or repeated unwanted offensive comments or gestures of a sexually explicit nature toward, or in the presence of, another person; or

Displays or transmits to another person, without legal justification or lawful authorization, imagery of a sexually explicit nature.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 75, § 6, effective July 15, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 75, sec. 6 provided that a new section of KRS Chapter 35 was created to be numbered as KRS

35.680

. However, a statute had previously been numbered as KRS

35.680

when it was created in 1970 and then
renumbered as KRS

35.730

in 2013. Since the designation of “35.680” had been applied to an earlier statute and should not be assigned to a different statute because it would create confusion, the Reviser of Statutes has numbered 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 75, sec. 6 (this statute) as KRS

35.679

instead under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(a).

35.680.
General misconduct. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

35.681.
Rape and sexual assault generally.

Any person subject to this code is guilty of rape and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who commits a sexual act upon another person by:

Using unlawful force against another person;

Using force causing or likely to cause death or grievous bodily harm to any person;

Threatening or placing that other person in fear that any person will be subject to death, grievous bodily harm, or kidnapping;

First rendering that other person unconscious; or

Administering to that other person by force or threat of force, or without the knowledge or consent of that person, a drug, intoxicant, or other similar substance and thereby substantially impairing the ability of that other person to appraise or control conduct.

Any person subject to this code is guilty of sexual assault and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Commits a sexual act upon another person by:

Threatening or placing that other person in fear;

Causing bodily harm to that other person;

Making a fraudulent representation that the sexual act serves a professional purpose; or

Inducing a belief by an artifice, pretense, or concealment that the person is another person;

Commits a sexual act upon another person when the person knows or reasonably should know that the other person is asleep, unconscious, or otherwise unaware that the sexual act is occurring; or

Commits a sexual act upon another person when the other person is incapable of consenting to the sexual act due to:

Impairment by any drug, intoxicant, or other similar substance, and that condition is known or reasonably should be known by the person; or

A mental disease or defect, or physical disability, and that condition is known or reasonably should be known by the person.

Any person subject to this code who commits or causes sexual contact upon or by another person, if to do so would violate subsection (1) of this section had the sexual contact been a sexual act, is guilty of aggravated sexual contact and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Any person subject to this chapter who commits or causes sexual contact upon or by another person, if to do so would violate subsection (2) of this section had the sexual contact been a sexual act, is guilty of abusive sexual contact and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

In a prosecution under this section, in proving that a person made a threat, it need not be proven that the person actually intended to carry out the threat or had the ability to carry out the threat.

An accused may raise any applicable defenses available under this code. Marriage is not a defense for the conduct in issue in any prosecution under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 122, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 75, § 7, effective July 15, 2016.

35.683.
Rape of a child.

Any person subject to this code is guilty of rape of a child and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Commits a sexual act upon a child who has not attained the age of twelve (12) years; or

Commits a sexual act upon a child who has attained the age of twelve (12) years by:

Using force against any person;

Threatening or placing that child in fear;

Rendering that child unconscious; or

Administering to that child a drug, intoxicant, or other similar substance.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 75, § 8, effective July 15, 2016.

35.685.
Stalking.

Any person subject to this code is guilty of stalking and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Wrongfully engages in a course of conduct directed at a specific person that would cause a reasonable person to fear death or bodily harm, including sexual assault, to himself or herself or a member of his or her immediate family;

Has knowledge, or should have knowledge, that the specific person will be placed in reasonable fear of death or bodily harm, including sexual assault, to himself or herself or a member of his or her immediate family; and

By his or her acts, induces reasonable fear in the specific person or bodily harm, including sexual assault, to himself or herself or to a member of his or her immediate family, through the person’s actions.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 123, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 75, § 9, effective July 15, 2016.

35.690.
Other sexual misconduct.

Any person subject to this code is guilty of an offense under this section and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who, without legal justification or lawful authorization:

Knowingly or wrongfully views the private area of another person, without that other person’s consent and under circumstances in which that other person has a reasonable expectation of privacy;

Knowingly photographs, videotapes, films, or records by any means the private area of another person, without that other person’s consent or under circumstances in which that other person has a reasonable expectation of privacy; or

Knowingly broadcasts or distributes any recording that the person knew or reasonably should have known was made under the circumstances proscribed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.

Any person subject to this code who compels another person to engage in the act of prostitution with any person is guilty of forcible pandering and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Any person subject to this code who intentionally exposes, in an indecent manner, the genitalia, anus, buttocks, or female areola or nipple is guilty of indecent exposure and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 124, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 75, § 10, effective July 15, 2016.

35.692.
Larceny and wrongful appropriation.

Any person subject to this code who wrongfully takes, obtains, or withholds, by any means, from the possession of the owner or of any other person any money, personal property, or articles of value of any kind:

With intent permanently to deprive or defraud another person of the use and benefit of property or to appropriate it to his or her own use or the use of any person other than the owner, steals that property and is guilty of larceny; or

With intent temporarily to deprive or defraud another person of the use and benefit of property or to appropriate it to his or her own use or the use of any person other than the owner, is guilty of wrongful appropriation.

Any person found guilty of larceny or wrongful appropriation shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 125, effective June 25, 2013.

35.695.
Robbery.

Any person subject to this code who with intent to steal takes anything of value from the person or in the presence of another, against his or her will, by means of force of violence or fear of immediate of future injury to his or her person or property or to the person or property of a relative or member of his or her family or of anyone in his or her company at the time of the robbery, is guilty of robbery and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 126, effective June 25, 2013.

35.700.
Forgery.

Any person subject to this code is guilty of forgery and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who, with intent to defraud:

Falsely makes or alters any signature to, or any part of, any writing which would, if genuine, apparently impose a legal liability on another or change his or her legal right or liability to his or her prejudice; or

Utters, offers, issues, or transfers such a writing, known to him or her to be so made or altered.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 127, effective June 25, 2013.

35.702.
Making, drawing, or uttering check, draft, or order without sufficient funds.

Any person subject to this code is guilty of making, drawing, or uttering a check, draft, or order without sufficient funds and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

For the procurement of any article or thing of value, with the intent to defraud; or

For the payment of any past due obligation, or for any other purpose, with intent to deceive;

makes, draws, utters, or delivers any check, draft, or order for the payment of money upon any bank or other depository, knowing at the time that the maker or drawer has not or will not have sufficient funds in, or credit with, the bank or other depository for the payment of that check, draft, or order in full upon its presentment.

The making, drawing, uttering, or delivering by a maker or drawer of a check, draft, or order, payment of which is refused by the drawee because of insufficient funds of the maker or drawer in the drawee’s possession or control, is prima facie evidence of his or her intent to defraud or deceive and of his or her knowledge of insufficient funds in, or credit with, that bank or other depository, unless the maker or drawer pays the holder the amount due within five (5) days after receiving notice, orally or in writing, that the check, draft, or order was not paid on presentment.

In this section, “credit” means an arrangement or understanding, express or implied, with the bank or other depository for the payment of that check, draft, or order.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 128, effective June 25, 2013.

35.705.
Maiming.

Any person subject to this code is guilty of maiming and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who, with intent to injure, disfigure, or disable, inflicts upon the person of another an injury which:

Seriously disfigures his or her person by any mutilation thereof;

Destroys or disables any member or organ of his or her body; or

Seriously diminishes his or her physical vigor by the injury of any member or organ.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 129, effective June 25, 2013.

35.710.
Arson.

Any person subject to this code who willfully and maliciously burns or sets on fire an inhabited dwelling, or any other structure, movable or immovable, wherein to the knowledge of the offender there is at the time a human being, is guilty of aggravated arson and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Any person subject to this chapter who willfully and maliciously burns or sets fire to the property of another, except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, is guilty of simple arson and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 130, effective June 25, 2013.

35.712.
Extortion.

Any person subject to this code who communicates threats to another person with the intention thereby to obtain anything of value or any acquittance, advantage, or immunity is guilty of extortion and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 131, effective June 25, 2013.

35.715.
Assault.

Any person subject to this code who attempts or offers with unlawful force or violence to do bodily harm to another person, whether or not the attempt or offer is consummated, is guilty of assault and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Any person subject to this chapter is guilty of aggravated assault and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who:

Commits an assault with a dangerous weapon or other means or force likely to produce death or grievous bodily harm; or

Commits an assault and intentionally inflicts grievous bodily harm with or without a weapon.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 132, effective June 25, 2013.

35.717.
Burglary.

Any person subject to the code who, with intent to commit an offense punishable under KRS

35.681

,

35.685

,

35.690

,

35.692

,

35.695

,

35.700

,

35.702

,

35.705

,

35.710

,

35.712

, and

35.715

, breaks and enters, in the nighttime, the dwelling house of another, is guilty of burglary and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 133, effective June 25, 2013.

35.720.
Housebreaking.

Any person subject to this code who unlawfully enters the building or structure of another with intent to commit a criminal offense therein is guilty of housebreaking and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 134, effective June 25, 2013.

35.722.
Perjury.

Any subject person subject to this code is guilty of perjury and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct who, in a judicial proceeding or course of justice, willfully and corruptly:

Upon a lawful oath or in any form allowed by law to be substituted for an oath, gives any false testimony material to the issue or matter of inquiry; or

In any declaration, certificate, verification, or statement under penalty of perjury as permitted under 28

U.S.C. sec. 1746

, subscribes any false statement material to the issue or matter of inquiry.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 135, effective June 25, 2013.

35.725.
Frauds against the government.

Any person subject to this code who:

Knowing it to be false or fraudulent:

Makes any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer thereof; or

Presents to any person in the civil or military service thereof, for approval or payment, any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer thereof;

For the purposes of obtaining the approval, allowance, or payment of any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer thereof:

Makes or uses any writing or other paper knowing it to contain any false or fraudulent statements;

Makes any oath, affirmation, or certification to any fact or to any writing or other paper knowing the oath, affirmation, or certification to be false; or

Forges or counterfeits any signature upon any writing or other paper, or uses any such signature knowing it to be forged or counterfeited;

Having charge, possession, custody, or control of any money, or other property of the United States or the state, furnished or intended for the Armed Forces of the United States or the state military forces, knowingly delivers to any person having authority to receive it, any amount thereof less than that for which he or she receives a certificate or receipt; or

Being authorized to make or deliver any paper certifying the receipt of any property of the United States or the state, furnished or intended for the Armed Forces of the United States or the state military forces, makes or delivers to any person such writing without having full knowledge of the truth of the statements therein contained and with intent to defraud the United States or the state;

shall, upon conviction, be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 136, effective June 25, 2013.

35.727.
Conduct unbecoming an officer and a gentleman.

Any commissioned officer, cadet, candidate, or midshipman who is convicted of conduct unbecoming an officer and a gentleman shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 137, effective June 25, 2013.

35.730.
General article.

Though not specifically mentioned in this code, all disorders and neglects to the prejudice of good order and discipline in the state military forces and all conduct of a nature to bring discredit upon the state military forces shall be taken cognizance of by a court-martial and punished at the discretion of a military court. However, where a crime constitutes an offense that violates both this code and the criminal laws of the state where the offense occurs or criminal laws of the United States, jurisdiction of the military court must be determined in accordance with KRS 35.015(2).

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 35, § 138, effective June 25, 2013.

35.800.
Courts of inquiry.

Courts of inquiry to investigate any matter of concern to the state military forces may be convened by any person authorized to convene a general court-martial, whether or not the persons involved have requested an inquiry.

A court of inquiry consists of three (3) or more commissioned officers. For each court of inquiry the convening authority shall also appoint counsel for the court.

Any person subject to this code whose conduct is subject to inquiry shall be designated as a party. Any person subject to this code who has a direct interest in the subject of inquiry has the right to be designated as a party upon request to the court. Any person designated as a party shall be given due notice and shall have the right to be present, to be represented by counsel, to cross-examine witnesses, and to introduce evidence.

Members of a court of inquiry may be challenged by a party, but only for cause stated to the court.

The members, counsel, the reporter, and interpreters of courts of inquiry shall take an oath or affirmation to faithfully perform their duties.

Witnesses may be summoned to appear and testify and be examined before courts of inquiry, as provided for courts-martial.

Courts of inquiry shall make findings of fact but shall not express opinions or make recommendations unless required to do so by the convening authority.

Each court of inquiry shall keep a record of its proceedings, which shall be authenticated by the signatures of the president and counsel for the court and forwarded to the convening authority. If the record cannot be authenticated by the president it shall be signed by a member in lieu of the president. If the record cannot be authenticated by the counsel for the court it shall be signed by a member in lieu of the counsel.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 139, effective June 25, 2013.